District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.31

Rulemaking.

The Commissioner may prescribe rules governing the activities of universal banks and implementing this chapter, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 231, 48 DCR 3244